Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 38
MINORS — CONSENT TO TREATMENT

Sec.

§ 39-3801. Infectious, contagious, or communicable disease — Medical treatment of minor 14 years of age or older — Consent of parents or guardian unnecessary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a minor fourteen (14) years of age or older who may have come into contact with any infectious, contagious, or communicable disease may give consent to the furnishing of hospital, medical and surgical care related to the diagnosis or treatment of such disease, if the disease or condition is one which is required by law, or regulation adopted pursuant to law, to be reported to the local health officer. Such consent shall not be subject to disaffirmance because of minority. The consent of the parent, parents, or legal guardian of such minor shall not be necessary to authorize hospital, medical and surgical care related to such disease and such parent, parents, or legal guardian shall not be liable for payment for any care rendered pursuant to this section.